Washington statutes.
RCW 5.51.050

Protective order—Application to court.

An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under RCW 5.51.020 must comply with the rules or statutes of Washington state and be submitted to the court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted.

[ 2012 c 95 s 6.]